Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Chapter 9 Veterans' Home of Wyoming

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to the establishment of charitable and penal institutions under the supervision of the state board of charities and reform, see art. 7, § 18, Wyo. Const.

As to public health and safety relating to state institutions generally, see title 35.

For authority of public utilities to furnish transportation free or at reduced rates to certain classes of persons, see §

37-3-105

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

77 Am. Jur. 2d Veterans and Veterans' Laws §§ 57 to 79.

6 C.J.S. Armed Services § 259.

§ 25-9-101.
Purpose; admission of veterans and veterans' dependents.

Except as otherwise authorized by rules and regulations promulgated in accordance with W.S. 9-2-106(d), the veterans’ home of Wyoming shall provide domiciliary level care and, if appropriate facilities are completed, may provide skilled nursing facility level care to:

Honorably discharged veterans of the armed forces of the United States; and

Members of the state national guard disabled while on duty.

Persons qualifying under subsection (a) of this section shall also be persons who:

By reason of wounds, disease, old age or other infirmities are unable to earn their living and have no adequate means of support; and

Have been domiciled in this state for at least five (5) years next preceding their application for admission to the home.

The department of health may admit dependents of soldiers, sailors or disabled members of the national guard, if it deems admission proper.

There is created an account for use by the veterans’ home of Wyoming for the general benefit of residents of the veterans’ home. Profits from the sale of commodities at the veterans’ home canteen after provision for increased inventories and servicing of the canteen facility and the interest earned from those profits shall be transferred to the account created by this subsection and are continuously appropriated to the department of health to be expended solely for the benefit of the veterans’ home.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 17, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 690; Laws 1903, ch. 46, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 579; C.S. 1920, § 668; Laws 1929, ch. 101, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 108-1301; C.S. 1945, § 19-301; Laws 1951, ch. 80, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-484; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-1001; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 11, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1998, ch. 11, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2016 ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (d).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “shall provide domiciliary level care and, if appropriate facilities are completed, may provide skilled nursing facility level care to” for “is for the care and treatment of” in (a).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 25-9-102.
When nonveterans permitted admission; preference to veterans and veterans' dependents.

The department of health may admit persons who are not veterans or dependents of veterans for care and treatment at the veterans’ home of Wyoming if:

The home is not filled to ninety percent (90%) of capacity and there are pending no applications of veterans or veterans’ dependents;

The applicants are unable to earn their living and have no adequate means of support because of disease, old age or other infirmities;

The applicants have been domiciled in this state for at least five (5) years next preceding their application for admission to the home;

The persons are admitted pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated in accordance with W.S. 9-2-106(d).

In all cases veterans and dependents of veterans shall be given preference of admission.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 10, §§ 1 to 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-484.1 to 9-484.3; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-6-1002 to 9-6-1004; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 11, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1998, ch. 11, § 1.

§ 25-9-103.
Acceptance of donations.

The department of health on behalf of the state may accept donations of lands, money or other property.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 17, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 691; C.S. 1910, § 581; C.S. 1920, § 670; R.S. 1931, § 108-1303; C.S. 1945, § 19-303; W.S. 1957, § 9-486; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-1006; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 25-9-104.
Medical care of residents; burial of deceased residents.

The department of health shall:

Furnish medical care for all residents of the home;

Provide a place of burial; and

Bury deceased residents.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 17, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 692; C.S. 1910, § 582; C.S. 1920, § 671; R.S. 1931, § 108-1304; C.S. 1945, § 19-304; W.S. 1957, § 9-487; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-1007; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 25-9-105.
Disposition of monies received from national home for disabled volunteer soldiers.

Money received from the board of managers of the national home for disabled volunteer soldiers shall be deposited in a separate account. The money shall be expended by the department of health for the veterans’ home of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 17, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 698; C.S. 1910, § 588; C.S. 1920, § 677; R.S. 1931, § 108-1309; C.S. 1945, § 19-309; W.S. 1957, § 9-492; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-1010; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 11, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the trust and agency fund.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 25-9-106.
Chaplain; appointment; term; duties.

The department of health may appoint a chaplain of the veterans’ home of Wyoming who shall hold his office for a period of one (1) year from date of his appointment unless removed for cause. He shall have charge of the moral and intellectual welfare of the residents of the home. He shall visit the home at least twice a month and provide services therein as he desires.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 20, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 679; R.S. 1931, § 108-1311; C.S. 1945, § 19-311; W.S. 1957, § 9-494; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-1011; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 11, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.